Utah statutes.
72-11-206.   Annual application for passenger ropeway registration.

(1)  Every operator of a passenger ropeway, or person who plans to operate a passenger ropeway, shall, prior to operating the passenger ropeway, apply to the  committee on forms provided by the committee for registration of the passenger ropeway.

(2)  Passenger ropeway registrations are valid for a one-year period as established by rule of the committee under Section 72-11-210.

(3)  The application shall contain sufficient information for the committee to determine if the passenger ropeway to be registered complies with  Section 72-11-201 and the rules made by the committee under Section 72-11-210.

